District of Columbia statutes.
7-761.08

Transfers of authority.

(a)

All real or personal property, leased or assigned to the Department of Human Services on behalf of the Mental Retardation and Developmental Disabilities Administration, positions, assets, records, and obligations, and all unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available relating to those powers, duties, functions, and operations of the DHS as set forth in, and utilized to carry out, section III(U) of part B of subchapter IV of Chapter 15 of Title 1, [lexis.com link: § 1-15-15], relating to MRDDA, are transferred to the Department.

(b)

No later than June 30, 2007, all real or personal property, leased or assigned to the Department of Human Services on behalf of the Rehabilitation Services Administration, positions, assets, records, and obligations, and all unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available relating to those powers, duties, functions, and operations of the DHS as set forth in, and utilized to carry out, section III(V) of part B of subchapter IV of Chapter 15 of Title 1 [of the Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1986 [lexis.com link: § 1-15-15], effective January 3, 1987] and those functions and operations of the DHS pertaining only to social security disability and social security income eligibility determinations as set forth in, and utilized to carry out, section III(T) of part B of subchapter IV of Chapter 15 of Title 1 [lexis.com link: § 1-15-15], relating to RSA, shall be transferred to the Department.

(c)

The Chief Financial Officer shall promptly create within the system of accounting and reporting a separate account for the appropriations and expenditures of the Department, distinct from the accounts of DHS.

(d)

(1)

All of the authority and functions of the DHS as set forth in section III(U) of part B of subchapter IV of Chapter 15 of Title 1 [lexis.com link: § 1-15-15], are transferred to the Department.

(2)

No later than June 30, 2007, all of the authority and functions of the DHS as set forth in section III(V) of part B of subchapter IV of Chapter 15 of Title 1 [lexis.com link: § 1-15-15], and the authority and functions pertaining to social security disability and social security income eligibility determinations as set forth in section III(T) of part B of subchapter IV of Chapter 15 of Title 1 [lexis.com link: § 1-15-15], shall be transferred to the Department.

History

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-264, § 108, 54 DCR 818

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 108 of Developmental Disabilities Services Management Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-672, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 1155).

Mayor's Orders

Designation of the Office of Human Rights as the Administrator of the Client Assistance Program, see Mayor’s Order 2010-66, May 14, 2010 ( 57 DCR 4283).